Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-707
Eyewitness identification and memory; expert witness; admissibility of testimony.

The testimony of an expert witness regarding eyewitness identification and memory may be admitted in any criminal or civil proceeding pursuant to the rules governing admissibility of evidence set forth in the Nebraska Evidence Rules.

Laws 2020, LB881, § 4.